tex/context/patterns/lang-la.pat
% context pattern file, see lang-all.xml for original comment

% source of data: lahyph.tex

% begin description data

% <!-- copied from lang-all.xml
% 
% <?xml version='1.0' standalone='yes'?>
% 
% <description language='la'>
%     <sourcefile>lahyph.tex</sourcefile>
%     <title>TeX hyphenation patterns for the Latin language</title>
%     <remarks>v3.0b</remarks>
%     <copyright>
%         <year>1999-2001</year>
%         <owner>Claudio Beccari</owner>
%     </copyright>
%     <copyright>
%         <year>1993, 1994, 1998, 1999</year>
%         <owner>Bernd Raichle/DANTE e.V.</owner>
%         <comment>Macro code in 'dehypht.tex'</comment>
%     </copyright>
% </description>
% 
% end of copy -->

% end description data

% begin pattern data

\patterns {
2'2
.ab2s3
.a2b3l
.anti1
.anti3m2n
.ca4p3s
.circu2m1
.co2n1iun
.di2s3cine
.e2x1
.o2b3
.para1i
.para1u
.pre1i
.pro1i
.su2b3lu
.su2b3r
2s3que.
2s3dem.
3p2sic
3p2neu
[aeligature]e1
[oeligature]e1
[aeligature]1
[oeligature]1
a1ia
a1ie
a1io
a1iu
ae1a
ae1o
ae1u
e1iu
io1i
o1ia
o1ie
o1io
o1iu
uo3u
1b
2bb
2bd
b2l
2bm
2bn
b2r
2bt
2bs
2b.
1c
2cc
c2h2
c2l
2cm
2cn
2cq
c2r
2cs
2ct
2cz
2c.
1d
2dd
2dg
2dm
d2r
2ds
2dv
2d.
1f
2ff
f2l
2fn
f2r
2ft
2f.
1g
2gg
2gd
2gf
g2l
2gm
g2n
g2r
2gs
2gv
2g.
1h
2hp
2ht
2h.
1j
1k
2kk
k2h2
1l
2lb
2lc
2ld
2lf
l3f2t
2lg
2lk
2ll
2lm
2ln
2lp
2lq
2lr
2ls
2lt
2lv
2l.
1m
2mm
2mb
2mp
2ml
2mn
2mq
2mr
2mv
2m.
1n
2nb
2nc
2nd
2nf
2ng
2nl
2nm
2nn
2np
2nq
2nr
2ns
n2s3m
n2s3f
2nt
2nv
2nx
2n.
1p
p2h
p2l
2pn
2pp
p2r
2ps
2pt
2pz
2php
2pht
2p.
1qu2
1r
2rb
2rc
2rd
2rf
2rg
r2h
2rl
2rm
2rn
2rp
2rq
2rr
2rs
2rt
2rv
2rz
2r.
1s2
2s3ph
2s3s
2stb
2stc
2std
2stf
2stg
2st3l
2stm
2stn
2stp
2stq
2sts
2stt
2stv
2s.
2st.
1t
2tb
2tc
2td
2tf
2tg
t2h
t2l
t2r
2tm
2tn
2tp
2tq
2tt
2tv
2t.
1v
v2l
v2r
2vv
1x
2xt
2xx
2x.
1z
2z.
a1ua
a1ue
a1ui
a1uo
a1uu
e1ua
e1ue
e1ui
e1uo
e1uu
i1ua
i1ue
i1ui
i1uo
i1uu
o1ua
o1ue
o1ui
o1uo
o1uu
u1ua
u1ue
u1ui
u1uo
u1uu
a2l1ua
a2l1ue
a2l1ui
a2l1uo
a2l1uu
e2l1ua
e2l1ue
e2l1ui
e2l1uo
e2l1uu
i2l1ua
i2l1ue
i2l1ui
i2l1uo
i2l1uu
o2l1ua
o2l1ue
o2l1ui
o2l1uo
o2l1uu
u2l1ua
u2l1ue
u2l1ui
u2l1uo
u2l1uu
a2m1ua
a2m1ue
a2m1ui
a2m1uo
a2m1uu
e2m1ua
e2m1ue
e2m1ui
e2m1uo
e2m1uu
i2m1ua
i2m1ue
i2m1ui
i2m1uo
i2m1uu
o2m1ua
o2m1ue
o2m1ui
o2m1uo
o2m1uu
u2m1ua
u2m1ue
u2m1ui
u2m1uo
u2m1uu
a2n1ua
a2n1ue
a2n1ui
a2n1uo
a2n1uu
e2n1ua
e2n1ue
e2n1ui
e2n1uo
e2n1uu
i2n1ua
i2n1ue
i2n1ui
i2n1uo
i2n1uu
o2n1ua
o2n1ue
o2n1ui
o2n1uo
o2n1uu
u2n1ua
u2n1ue
u2n1ui
u2n1uo
u2n1uu
a2r1ua
a2r1ue
a2r1ui
a2r1uo
a2r1uu
e2r1ua
e2r1ue
e2r1ui
e2r1uo
e2r1uu
i2r1ua
i2r1ue
i2r1ui
i2r1uo
i2r1uu
o2r1ua
o2r1ue
o2r1ui
o2r1uo
o2r1uu
u2r1ua
u2r1ue
u2r1ui
u2r1uo
u2r1uu
}

% end pattern data
